test/src/disamb-gt-desc-yamls/sme-tests_disamb-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - bietna: # -a stem, root vowel -ie-
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Nom: bietna
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Gen: biena
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Acc: biena
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Ill: bitnii
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Loc: bienas
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Sg+Com: bienain
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Pl+Nom: bienat
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Pl+Gen: bienaid
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Pl+Acc: bienaid
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Pl+Ill: bienaide
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Pl+Loc: bienain
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Pl+Com: bienaiguin
    bietna+N+Sem/DummyTag+Ess: bietnan
